Washington statutes.
RCW 39.114.040

Notice.

The local government designating the increment area must:

(1) Provide written notice to the governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is located a minimum of 90 days before submitting the project analysis to the office of the treasurer as required in RCW 39.114.020(7)(c);

(2) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the local government at least two weeks before the date on which the ordinance authorizing creation of an increment area is adopted that describes the public improvements, describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public information concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and

(3) Deliver a certified copy of the adopted ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, and the governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is located at the respective addresses specified pursuant to RCW 42.56.040 within 10 days of the date on which the ordinance was adopted.

[ 2024 c 236 s 3; 2023 c 354 s 3; 2021 c 207 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 354: See note following RCW 39.114.010.